Illinois, session 104th, HB1447.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Treasurer Act is amended by changing 5Section 10 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 505/10)  (from Ch. 130, par. 10)7    Sec. 10. Direct deposit of State payments. The Treasurer 8shall not pay out of the treasury any money, except upon the 9warrant of the State Comptroller, provided that warrants shall 10not be required where payments are made by the Comptroller:11        (1) to providers of community-based mental health 12    services; ,13        (2) to persons receiving benefit payments under the 14    State pension systems; ,15        (3) to individuals receiving assistance under Article 16    III of the Illinois Public Aid Code; , or17        (4) to a public agency as defined in the Public Funds 18    Investment Act; or ,19        (5) by direct deposit or by the electronic direct 20    deposit or transfer of funds.21    These payments, however, shall only be made upon the 22approval of the Treasurer, in the form and method provided by 23the rules or regulations adopted under Section 9.03 of the   HB1447 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07063 SPS 17100 b1State Comptroller Act.2(Source: P.A. 87-132; 87-653; 87-685; 87-751; 87-895; 88-643, 3eff. 1-1-95.) 4    Section 10. The Accountability for the Investment of 5Public Funds Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 237/10)7    Sec. 10. Online information concerning investment of 8public funds. Each State agency shall make available on the 9Internet, and update at least monthly, no later than the end of 10each month by the 15th of the month, sufficient information 11concerning the investment of any public funds held by that 12State agency to identify the following: 13        (1) the amount of funds held by that agency on the last 14    day of the preceding month or the average daily balance 15    for the preceding month; 16        (2) the total monthly investment income and yield for 17    all funds invested by that agency; 18        (3) the asset allocation of the investments made by 19    that agency; and 20        (4) a complete listing of all approved depository 21    institutions, commercial paper issuers, and broker-dealers 22    approved to do business with that agency.23(Source: P.A. 93-499, eff. 1-1-04.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB1447 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07063 SPS 17100 b1becoming law.